Missouri, session 2026, SB1376.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 376.060, 376.100, 379.035, 379.060,
379.520, and 379.590, RSMo, are repealed and six new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 376.060,
376.100, 379.035, 379.060, 379.520, and 379.590, to read as
follows:
376.060. When such corporators propose to form a joint
stock company for the purposes designated in section
376.010, the charter comprised in the declaration mentioned
in section 376.050 shall set forth
(1) The name assumed by such corporation and by which
it shall be known;
(2) The place where the principal office for the
transaction of its business shall be located;
(3) The specific kind or kinds of business which it
proposes to transact;
(4) The amount of its capital stock, and the number of
shares into which it shall be divided, and the manner in
which it shall be paid up or secured;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1376 2
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted
by sections 376.010 to 376.670 shall be exercised, showing
the number of directors, which shall not be less than [nine]
five or more than twenty-one, their powers and duties, the
manner of electing them, the mode of filling vacancies, and
such other particulars as may be necessary to make manifest
the objects and purposes of the corporation, and the manner
in which it is to be conducted.
376.100. When such corporators propose to form a
mutual company, for the purpose designated in section
376.010, the charter comprised in the declaration mentioned
in section 376.050 shall set forth:
(1) The name assumed by such corporation, and by which
it shall be known;
(2) The place where the principal office for the
transaction of its business shall be located;
(3) The specific kind or kinds of business which it
proposes to transact;
(4) The number of persons from whom proposals for
assurance shall be received, the amount of premiums to be
received on deposit, and the amount of cash to be paid on
the same, before the company shall begin to do business and
issue policies;
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted
by sections 376.010 to 376.670 are to be exercised, showing
the number of directors, which shall not be more than twenty-
one nor less than [nine] five, their powers and duties, the
manner of their election, the mode of filling vacancies, and
such other particulars as may be necessary to make manifest
the objects and purposes of the association, and the manner
in which it is to be conducted.

SB 1376 3
379.035. When such incorporators propose to form a
corporation for the purposes designated in section 379.010,
on the joint stock plan, the articles of incorporation or
association comprised in the declaration in section 379.030
shall set forth:
(1) The name assumed by such corporation, and by which
it shall be known;
(2) The place where the principal office for the
transaction of its business shall be located;
(3) The specific kind or kinds of business which it
proposes to transact;
(4) The amount of its capital stock, and the number of
shares into which it shall be divided, and the manner in
which it shall be paid up or secured;
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted
by this chapter shall be exercised, showing the number of
directors, which shall not be less than [nine] five nor more
than twenty-five; and such other particulars as may be
necessary to make manifest the objects and purposes of the
corporation, and the manner in which it is to be conducted.
379.060. When such incorporators propose to form a
corporation for the purpose of doing business on the mutual
plan, the charter comprised in the declaration mentioned in
section 379.030 shall set forth:
(1) The name assumed by such corporation, and by which
it shall be known;
(2) The place where the principal office for the
transaction of its business shall be located;
(3) The specific kind or kinds of business which it
proposes to transact;
(4) The number of persons from whom proposals for
insurance shall be received, the amount of premiums to be

SB 1376 4
received on deposit, and the amount of cash to be paid on
the same, before the company shall begin to do business and
issue policies;
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted
by sections 379.010 to 379.160 are to be exercised, showing
the number of directors and trustees, which shall not be
more than thirteen nor less than [nine] five, and their
respective powers and duties, and such other particulars as
may be necessary to make manifest the object and purposes of
the association, and the manner in which it is to be
conducted.
379.520. Whenever any such corporation desires to
avail itself of the provisions of sections 379.515 to
379.580 and to reorganize and extend and continue its
corporate existence under the general laws of this state
after the time limited by law or its charter for the
termination of its corporate existence, the directors
thereof shall within one year prior to such time draw up and
submit to its stockholders, if it be a stock company, or to
its policyholders if it be a mutual company, or to its
stockholders and its policyholders in its mutual department
if it be a stock and mutual company, articles of
association, which shall set forth
(1) The name of the company;
(2) The place where the principal office for the
transaction of business shall be located;
(3) The specific kinds of business it proposes to
transact;
(4) The period of time for which its corporate
existence shall be extended and continued;
(5) The manner in which the corporate powers granted
under the general insurance statutes shall be exercised,

SB 1376 5
showing the number of directors, which shall not be more
than twenty-five nor less than [nine] five, and such other
particulars as may be necessary to make manifest the objects
and purposes of the corporation; provided, however, that the
name of the corporation shall not be changed, nor shall the
objects or plan of business embrace any other or more than
under the general insurance statutes of this state can be
carried on by any one corporation.
379.590. When any such company desires to avail itself
of the provisions of sections 379.585 to 379.625, the
directors thereof shall draw up articles of association
which shall set forth
(1) The name of the company;
(2) The place where the principal office for the
transaction of business shall be located;
(3) The specific kind of business it proposes to
transact;
(4) The manner in which the corporate powers granted
under the general insurance statutes shall be exercised,
showing the number of directors, which shall not be more
than thirteen nor less than [nine] five, and such other
particulars as may be necessary to make manifest the objects
and purposes of the corporation; provided, however, that the
name of the corporation shall not be changed, nor shall the
object or plan of business embrace any others than those
designated in the existing charter, nor embrace more than
under the general insurance statutes of this state can be
carried on by any one corporation.
✓